Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 4
BENEFITS

Sec.

§ 72-401. Dependency — When determined.

Dependency shall initially be determined as of the time of the accident causing the injury or of manifestation of an occupational disease for purposes of income benefits therefor, and as of the time of death for purposes of income benefits for death.

§ 72-402. Waiting period.

An injured employee shall not be allowed income benefits for the first five (5) days of disability for work; provided, if the injury results in disability for work exceeding two (2) weeks, income benefits shall be allowed from the date of disability and be paid no later than four (4) weeks from date of disability. Provided, further, that the waiting period shall not apply if the injured employee is hospitalized as an in-patient.

The day on which the injury occurred shall be included in computing the waiting period unless the employee has been paid wages for that day.

§ 72-403. Penalty for malingering — Denial of compensation.

If an injured employee refuses or unreasonably fails to seek physically or mentally suitable work, or refuses or unreasonably fails or neglects to work after such suitable work is offered to, procured by or secured for the employee, the injured employee shall not be entitled to temporary disability benefits during the period of such refusal or failure.

§ 72-404. Lump sum payments.

Whenever the commission determines that it is for the best interest of all parties, the liability of the employer for compensation may, on application to the commission by any party interested, be discharged in whole or in part by the payment of one or more lump sums to be determined, with the approval of the commission.

§ 72-405. Trustee in case of lump sum payment.

Whenever for any reason the commission deems it expedient, any lump sum to be paid as provided in section 72-404[, Idaho Code], shall be paid to some suitable person or corporation appointed as trustee to administer or apply the same for the benefit of the person or persons entitled thereto in the manner provided by the commission. The receipt of such trustee for the amount so paid shall discharge the employer or anyone else who is liable therefor.

§ 72-406. Deductions for preexisting injuries and infirmities.

In cases of permanent disability less than total, if the degree or duration of disability resulting from an industrial injury or occupational disease is increased or prolonged because of a preexisting physical impairment, the employer shall be liable only for the additional disability from the industrial injury or occupational disease.

Any income benefits previously paid an injured workman for permanent disability to any member or part of his body shall be deducted from the amount of income benefits provided for the permanent disability to the same member or part of his body caused by a change in his physical condition or by a subsequent injury or occupational disease.

§ 72-407. Certain injuries deemed total and permanent.

In case of the following injuries, if the employer disputes that the claimant is totally and permanently disabled, the burden of proof shall be on the employer to prove by clear and convincing evidence that the claimant is not permanently and totally disabled.

The total and permanent loss of sight in both eyes.

The loss of both feet at or above the ankle.

The loss of both hands at or above the wrist.

The loss of one (1) hand and one (1) foot.

An injury to the spine resulting in permanent and complete paralysis of both legs or arms or of one (1) leg and one (1) arm.

An injury to the skull resulting in incurable imbecility or insanity.

The above enumeration is not to be taken as exclusive.

§ 72-408. Income benefits for total and partial disability.

Income benefits for total and partial disability during the period of recovery, and thereafter in cases of total and permanent disability, shall be paid to the disabled employee subject to deduction on account of waiting period and subject to the maximum and minimum limits set forth in section 72-409, Idaho Code, as follows:

For a period not to exceed a period of fifty-two (52) weeks, an amount equal to sixty-seven per cent (67%) of his average weekly wage and thereafter an amount equal to sixty-seven per cent (67%) of the currently applicable average weekly state wage.

Partial disability. For partial disability during the period of recovery an amount equal to sixty-seven per cent (67%) of his decrease in wage-earning capacity, but in no event to exceed the income benefits payable for total disability.

Partial Permanent Disability.

Once a claimant’s condition is stabilized and his disability is rated, his benefits are calculated differently: If the disability is total, it is still computed by the “currently applicable average weekly state wage” of subdivision (1) or (2) of this section, but if it is a partial permanent disability, it is calculated under§ 72-428, which makes no reference to the “currently applicable” average weekly state wage of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section. Hence, the legislature intended benefits for partial permanent disability to be fixed and quantifiable. Partial permanent disability benefits are not, nor are they intended to be, whole-life benefits. Carey v. Clearwater County Rd. Dep’t, 107 Idaho 109, 686 P.2d 54 (1984).

The decision of the industrial commission awarding the claimant a permanent partial impairment rating of two and one-half percent of the whole man and denying the claimant retraining was supported by the evidence where the substantial medical evidence indicated no positive objective orthopedic findings nor any neurologic abnormalities and other evidence indicated the claimant’s ability to return to work at least in a related field, and that he would suffer no income loss as a result of the industrial accident. Doyle v. Spangler Bros., 110 Idaho 757, 718 P.2d 1195 (1986).

§ 72-409. Maximum and minimum income benefits for total disability.

The weekly income benefits provided for in section 72-408(1), Idaho Code, shall be subject to a maximum of ninety percent (90%) and a minimum of forty-five percent (45%) of the currently applicable average weekly state wage, provided, however, that during the first fifty-two (52) weeks of total disability income benefits shall not in any case exceed ninety percent (90%) of the employee’s average weekly wage, but if during the first fifty-two (52) weeks ninety percent (90%) of the employee’s average weekly wage is less than fifteen percent (15%) of the currently applicable average weekly state wage, then the employee shall receive no less than fifteen percent (15%) of the currently applicable average weekly state wage, except as benefits may be increased by reason of increases in the average weekly state wage as computed in subsection (2) hereof, nor shall income benefits paid subsequent to the first fifty-two (52) weeks of total disability exceed income benefits paid during the first fifty-two (52) weeks of total disability except as the same may be increased by reason of increases in the average weekly state wage, provided, however, that where an employee’s benefit rate for the first fifty-two (52) week period was less than the minimums prescribed above, his benefit rate thereafter shall be not less than forty-five percent (45%) of the currently applicable average weekly state wage.

For the purpose of this law the average weekly wage in the state shall be determined by the commission as follows: on or before June 1 of each year, the total wages reported on contribution reports to the department of employment for the preceding calendar year shall be divided by the average monthly number of insured workers determined by dividing the total insured workers reported for the preceding year by twelve (12). The average annual wage thus obtained shall be divided by fifty-two (52) and the average weekly state wage thus determined rounded to the nearest dollar. The average weekly state wage as so determined shall be applicable for the calendar year commencing January 1 following the June 1 determination.

§ 72-410. Dependents.

The following persons, and they only, shall be deemed dependents and entitled to income benefits under the provisions of this act:

A child:

Under eighteen (18) years of age, or incapable of self-support and unmarried, whether or not actually dependent upon the deceased employee;

Under twenty-three (23) years of age if a full-time student and as provided for in section 72-412(3), Idaho Code.

The widow or widower only if living with the deceased or living apart from the deceased for justifiable cause, or actually dependent, wholly or partially, upon the deceased.

A parent or grandparent only if actually dependent, wholly or partially, upon the deceased.

A grandchild, brother or sister only if under eighteen (18) years of age, or incapable of self-support, and actually dependent wholly upon the deceased.

§ 72-411. Time of dependency.

The relation of dependency must exist at the time of the accident causing the injury or manifestation of occupational disease.

§ 72-412. Periods of income benefits for death.

The income benefits for death herein provided for shall be payable during the following periods:

To a widow or widower, until death or remarriage, but in no case to exceed five hundred (500) weeks.

Unless as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, to or for a child, until eighteen (18) years of age, and if incapable of self-support after age eighteen (18) years for an additional period not to exceed five hundred (500) weeks, deducting the period benefits which were paid prior to eighteen (18) years of age. Provided, income benefits payable to or for any child shall cease when such child marries.

To or for a child after age eighteen (18) years who is enrolled as a full-time student in any accredited educational institution, or accredited vocational training program, until such child ceases to be so enrolled or reaches the age of twenty-three (23) years, whichever occurs first. Provided, in the event the child reaches the age of twenty-three (23) years during the quarter or semester in which the child is enrolled, benefits shall continue until the completion of the quarter or semester in which the child reached the age of twenty-three (23) years. This extension of benefits to the age of twenty-three (23) years shall not apply if the accident causing the injury or manifestation of the occupational disease occurred prior to December 31, 2006.

To a parent or grandparent, during the continuation of a condition of actual dependency, but in no case to exceed five hundred (500) weeks.

To or for a grandchild, brother or sister, during dependency as hereinbefore defined, but in no case to exceed five hundred (500) weeks.

In case death occurs after a period of disability, either total or partial, the period of disability shall be deducted from the total periods of compensation respectively stated in this section.

§ 72-413. Income benefits for death.

If death results from the accident or occupational disease within four (4) years from the date of the accident, or manifestation of the occupational disease, the employer shall pay to or for the benefit of the following particular classes of dependents’ weekly income benefits equal to the following percentages of the average weekly state wage as defined in section 72-409, Idaho Code. The benefits payable hereunder shall be subject to annual adjustment as provided in section 72-409(2), Idaho Code. The annual adjustment provided herein shall not apply to benefits for an injury or occupational disease resulting in death if the accident causing the injury or the manifestation of the occupational disease occurred prior to July 1, 1991.

To a dependent widow or widower, if there be no dependent children, forty-five per cent (45%).

To a dependent widow or widower, if there be dependent children, an additional five per cent (5%) of the average weekly state wage for each dependent child to and including a total of three (3). Such compensation to the widow or widower shall be for the use and benefit of the widow or widower and of the dependent children and the commission may from time to time apportion such compensation between them in such a way as it deems best.

If there be no dependent widow or widower, but a dependent child or children, thirty per cent (30%) of the average weekly state wage for one (1) child and ten per cent (10%) for each additional child to and including a total of three (3), to a maximum not to exceed sixty per cent (60%) of the average weekly state wage, to be divided equally among such children.

To the parents, if one (1) be wholly dependent for support upon the deceased employee at the time of his death and the other is not dependent to any extent, twenty-five per cent (25%) of the average weekly state wage; if both are wholly dependent, twenty per cent (20%) of the average weekly state wage to each; if one (1) be or both are partly dependent, a proportionate amount in the discretion of the commission.

To the brothers, sisters, grandparents and grandchildren, if one (1) be wholly dependent upon the deceased employee at the time of his death, twenty per cent (20%) of the average state weekly wage to such dependents; if more than one be wholly dependent, thirty per cent (30%) of the average state weekly wage, divided among such dependents, share and share alike. If there be no one (1) of them wholly dependent, but one (1) or more partially dependent, ten per cent (10%) of the average state weekly wage divided among such dependents, share and share alike.

The above percentages shall be paid if there be no dependent widow, widower or child. If there be a widow, widower or child, there shall be paid so much of the above percentages as, when added to the total percentage payable to the widow, widower and children, will not exceed a total of sixty per cent (60%) of the average state weekly wage.

The above percentages shall be paid if there be no dependent widow, widower, child or parent. If there be a dependent widow, widower, child or parent, there shall be paid so much of the above percentages as, when added to the total percentages payable to the widow, widower, children and dependent parents, will not exceed a total of sixty per cent (60%) of the average weekly state wage.
Payments made for and on behalf of a dependent child or children shall be made to such child’s or children’s natural or adoptive surviving parent for the use and benefit of the child or children, if such child or children reside with such parent, notwithstanding the remarriage of such parent; provided, however, if the care and the custody of such child or children has been awarded by a court of competent jurisdiction of this state or any other state to a person or persons other than the child’s or children’s natural or adoptive parent, then such payments shall be made to that person or those persons so awarded care and custody for the use and benefit of the child or children. Whenever the commission deems it necessary, it may direct any payments made hereunder to be made under such terms and conditions as it deems necessary.

§ 72-413A. Lump sum payment upon remarriage.

In the event of remarriage of the widow or widower prior to the expiration of five hundred (500) weeks as provided in section 42-412 [72-412], Idaho Code, a lump sum shall be paid to the widow or widower in an amount equal to the lesser of one hundred (100) weeks or the total of income benefits for the remainder of the five-hundred (500) week period computed on the basis of a weekly rate of forty-five per cent (45%) of the average weekly state wage in effect at the time of remarriage. The provisions of this section shall not apply to benefits for an injury or occupational disease resulting in death where the accident causing the injury or the manifestation of the occupational disease occurred prior to July 1, 1991.

§ 72-414. Apportionment benefits between classes.

In case there are two (2) or more classes of persons entitled to compensation under section 72-413[, Idaho Code], and the apportionment of such compensation as above provided, would result in injustice, the commission may, in its discretion, modify the apportionment to meet the requirements of the case.

§ 72-415. Change in dependents.

Upon the cessation of the income benefits for death to or on account of any person, the income benefits of the remaining persons entitled to income benefits for the unexpired part of the period during which their income benefits are payable shall be that which such persons would have received if they had been the only persons entitled to income benefits at the time of the decedent’s death.

§ 72-416. Maximum and minimum income benefits for death.

For purposes of income benefits for death, the average weekly wage of the employee shall be taken as not more than the average weekly wage of the state as determined in section 72-409, Idaho Code.

In no case shall the aggregate weekly income benefits payable to all beneficiaries under this section exceed the maximum income benefits that were or would have been payable for total disability to the deceased. Provided, however, that where an employee’s total disability benefits were or would have been less than forty-five per cent (45%) of the currently applicable average weekly state wage, death benefits shall be computed subject to the maximum of that to which a claimant would have been eligible after the first fifty-two (52) weeks of total disability.

§ 72-417. Maximum total payment.

The maximum weekly income benefits payable for all beneficiaries in case of death shall not exceed sixty per cent (60%) of the average weekly wage of the deceased as calculated under section 72-419[, Idaho Code], subject to the maximum limits in section 72-416[, Idaho Code]. The classes of beneficiaries specified in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) of section 72-413[, Idaho Code], shall have priority over all other beneficiaries in the apportionment of income benefits. If the provisions of said paragraphs should prevent payment to other beneficiaries of the income benefits to the full extent otherwise provided in section 72-413[, Idaho Code], the gross remaining amount of income benefits payable to such other beneficiaries shall be apportioned by class, proportionate to the interest of each class in the remaining amount. The dependents specified in paragraph 4) [(3)] of section 72-410[, Idaho Code], shall be considered to be in one (1) class and those specified in paragraph (5) [(4)] of said section, in another class.

§ 72-418. Computation of weeks and days.

In computing periods of disability and of compensation a week shall be computed as seven (7) days and a day as one-seventh (1/7) of a week, without regard to Sundays, holidays and working days.

§ 72-419. Determination of average weekly wage.

Except as otherwise provided in this law, the average weekly wage of the employee at the time of the accident causing the injury or of manifestation of the occupational disease shall be taken as the basis upon which to compute compensation and shall be determined as follows:

If at such time the wages are fixed by the week, the amount so fixed shall be the average weekly wage.

If at such time the wages are fixed by the month, the average weekly wage shall be the monthly wage so fixed multiplied by twelve (12) and divided by fifty-two (52).

If at such time the wages are fixed by the year, the average weekly wage shall be the yearly wage so fixed divided by fifty-two (52).

If at such time the wages are fixed by the day, hour or by the output of the employee, the average weekly wage shall be the wage most favorable to the employee computed by dividing by thirteen (13) his wages (not including overtime or premium pay) earned in the employ of the employer in the first, second, third or fourth period of thirteen (13) consecutive calendar weeks in the fifty-two (52) weeks immediately preceding the time of accident or manifestation of the disease.
(4)(a) If at such time the wages are fixed by the day, hour or by the output of the employee, the average weekly wage shall be the wage most favorable to the employee computed by dividing by thirteen (13) his wages (not including overtime or premium pay) earned in the employ of the employer in the first, second, third or fourth period of thirteen (13) consecutive calendar weeks in the fifty-two (52) weeks immediately preceding the time of accident or manifestation of the disease.

If the employee has been in the employ of the employer less than twelve (12) calendar weeks immediately preceding the accident or manifestation of the disease, his average weekly wage shall be computed under the foregoing paragraph, taking the wages (not including overtime or premium pay) for such purpose to be the amount he would have earned had he been so employed by the employer the full thirteen (13) calendar weeks immediately preceding such time and had worked, when work was available to other employees in a similar occupation.

If at such time the hourly wage has not been fixed or cannot be ascertained, the wage for the purpose of calculating compensation shall be taken to be the usual wage for similar services where such services are rendered by paid employees.

In seasonal occupations that do not customarily operate throughout the entire year, the average weekly wage shall be taken to be one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total wages which the employee has earned from all occupations during the twelve (12) calendar months immediately preceding the time of the accident or manifestation of the disease.

In the case of a volunteer emergency responder, the income benefits in the first fifty-two (52) weeks shall be based on the average weekly wage in his regular employment or sixty-seven percent (67%) of the current average weekly state wage, as determined pursuant to section 72-409(2), Idaho Code, whichever is greater.

If the employee was a minor, apprentice or trainee at the time of the accident or manifestation of the disease, and it is established that under normal conditions his wages should be expected to increase during the period of disability that fact may be considered in computing his average weekly wage.

When the employee is working under concurrent contracts with two (2) or more employers and the defendant employer has knowledge of such employment prior to the injury, the employee’s wages from all such employers shall be considered as if earned from the employer liable for compensation.

When circumstances are such that the actual rate of pay cannot be readily ascertained, the wage shall be deemed to be the contractual, customary or usual wage in the particular employment, industry or community for the same or similar service.

In the case of public employees covered under section 72-205(6), Idaho Code, the income benefits shall be based on the greater of the average weekly wage of the employee’s civilian employment and pay computed for one (1) weekend drill in a month, or full-time active duty pay fixed by the month as provided in section 46-605, Idaho Code.

Part-Time Employment.

When employee worked only one hour per week as extra hand, measure of compensation for his death was average weekly wages for constant employment in his line and not amount received for his one hour work each week. Flynn v. Carson, 42 Idaho 141, 243 P. 818 (1926).

The proper basis was the estimation of an employee’s earnings who worked only on an average of one-half a year, whose employer likewise operated for the same period, on a weekly basis of 1/52 of the employee’s yearly earnings. Sugars v. Ohio Match Co., 53 Idaho 408, 23 P.2d 743 (1933).

Yearly average wage was applied where a carpenter was hired to apply eleven squares of shingles at a rate of $2.00 per square, in computing the amount of weekly compensation. O’Niel v. Madison Lumber & Mill Co., 61 Idaho 546, 105 P.2d 194 (1940).

§ 72-420. Compensation to state when dependency not claimed or proved.

In case no claim for compensation is made by a dependent of a deceased employee and filed with the commission within one (1) year after the death, or in case a claim is made and filed within such year and no dependency proven, the employer shall pay into the state treasury the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to be deposited in the industrial special indemnity account [fund].

§ 72-421. Refund of payment to state after delayed proof of claim by minor or incompetent dependent.

If, after an employer has paid the sum provided for in section 72-420, Idaho Code, into the state treasury a claim is made and dependency proven by a person who during the one (1) year after the death in which a claim may be made was either a minor or mentally incompetent and who during the said year had no person or representative legally qualified under the provisions of the workmen’s compensation law to make a claim in his behalf, such sum shall be repaid to the employer on the order of the industrial commission; provided, that nothing in this act shall be construed as extending or increasing the time during which a claim for compensation by a dependent may be made.

§ 72-422. Permanent impairment.

“Permanent impairment” is any anatomic or functional abnormality or loss after maximal medical rehabilitation has been achieved and which abnormality or loss, medically, is considered stable or nonprogressive at the time of evaluation. Permanent impairment is a basic consideration in the evaluation of permanent disability, and is a contributing factor to, but not necessarily an indication of, the entire extent of permanent disability.

§ 72-423. Permanent disability.

“Permanent disability” or “under a permanent disability” results when the actual or presumed ability to engage in gainful activity is reduced or absent because of permanent impairment and no fundamental or marked change in the future can be reasonably expected.

§ 72-424. Permanent impairment evaluation.

“Evaluation (rating) of permanent impairment” is a medical appraisal of the nature and extent of the injury or disease as it affects an injured employee’s personal efficiency in the activities of daily living, such as self-care, communication, normal living postures, ambulation, elevation, traveling, and nonspecialized activities of bodily members.

§ 72-425. Permanent disability evaluation.

“Evaluation (rating) of permanent disability” is an appraisal of the injured employee’s present and probable future ability to engage in gainful activity as it is affected by the medical factor of permanent impairment and by pertinent nonmedical factors as provided in section 72-430, Idaho Code.

§ 72-426. The whole man — A period of five hundred weeks.

The “whole man” for purposes of computing disability evaluation of scheduled or unscheduled permanent injury (bodily loss or losses or loss of use) for conversion to scheduled income benefits, shall be a deemed period of disability of five hundred (500) weeks.

§ 72-427. Permanent impairment evaluation not exclusive.

The “whole man” income benefit evaluation for purposes of computing scheduled and unscheduled permanent impairment shall not be deemed to be exclusive for the purposes of fixing the evaluation of permanent disability.

§ 72-428. Scheduled income benefits for loss or losses of use of bodily members.

An employee who suffers a permanent disability less than total and permanent shall, in addition to the income benefits payable during the period of recovery, be paid income benefits for such permanent disability in an amount equal to fifty-five percent (55%) of the average weekly state wage stated against the following scheduled permanent impairments respectively:

Amputations of Upper Extremities Weeks

Amputations of Lower Extremities

Loss of Vision and Hearing
Total loss of vision of one eye ............................... 150

Total loss of use. Income benefits payable for permanent disability attributable to permanent total loss of use or comparable total loss of use of a member shall not be less than as for the loss of the member.

Partial loss or partial loss of use. Income benefits payable for permanent partial disability attributable to permanent partial loss or loss of use, of a member shall be not less than for a period as the permanent impairment attributable to the partial loss or loss of use of the member bears to total loss of the member.

Delay in rating. Following the period of recovery, a permanently disabled employee who has been afforded vocational retraining under a rehabilitation program shall be rated for permanent impairment only until completion of the vocational retraining program at which time he shall be rated for permanent disability, deducting from any monetary award therefor amounts previously awarded for permanent impairment only.

Forequarter amputation 350

Disarticulation at shoulder joint 300

Amputation of arm above deltoid

insertion 300

Amputation of arm between deltoid

insertion and elbow joint 285

Disarticulation at elbow joint 285

Amputation of forearm below elbow

joint proximal to insertion of

biceps tendon 285

Amputation of forearm below elbow

joint distal to insertion of

biceps tendon 270

Disarticulation at wrist joint 270

Midcarpal or mid-metacarpal

amputation of hand 270

Amputation of all fingers except

thumb at metacarpophalangeal

joints 160

Amputation of thumb

At metacarpophalangeal joint

or with resection of

carpometacarpal bone 110

At interphalangeal joint 80

Amputation of index finger

At metacarpophalangeal joint

or with resection of

metacarpal bone 70

At proximal interphalangeal

joint 55

At distal interphalangeal joint 30

Amputation of middle finger

At metacarpophalangeal joint

or with resection of

metacarpal bone 55
At proximal interphalangeal

joint 45

At distal interphalangeal joint 25

Amputation of ring finger

At metacarpophalangeal joint

or with resection of metacarpal bone 25

At proximal interphalangeal joint 20

At distal interphalangeal joint 12

Amputation of little finger

At metacarpophalangeal joint

or with resection of

metacarpal bone 15

At proximal interphalangeal

joint 10

At distal interphalangeal joint 5

Hemipelvectomy 250

Disarticulation at hip joint 200

Amputation above knee joint with

short thigh stump (3″ or less

below tuberosity of ischium) 200

Amputation above knee joint

with functional stump 180

Disarticulation at knee joint 180

Gritti-Stokes amputation 180

Amputation below knee joint with

short stump (3″ or less below

intercondylar notch) 180

Amputation below knee joint with

functional stump 140

Amputation at ankle (Syme) 140

Partial amputation of foot

(Chopart’s) 105

Mid-metatarsal amputation 70

Amputation of all toes

At metatarsophalangeal joints 42

Amputation of great toe

With resection of metatarsal bone 42

At metatarsophalangeal joint 25

At interphalangeal joint 25

Amputation of lesser toe (2nd-5th)

With resection of metatarsal bone 7

At metatarsophalangeal joint 4

At proximal interphalangeal joint 3

At distal interphalangeal joint 1

Loss of one eye by enucleation ............................... 175

Total loss of binaural hearing ............................... 175

§ 72-429. Unscheduled permanent disabilities.

In all other cases of permanent disabilities less than total not included in the foregoing schedule the amount of income benefits shall be not less than the evaluation in relation to the percentages of loss of the members, or of loss of the whole man, stated against the scheduled permanent impairments, as the disabilities bear to those produced by the permanent impairments named in the schedule. Weekly income benefits paid pursuant to this section shall likewise be paid at fifty-five percent (55%) of the average weekly state wage for the year of the injury as provided in section 72-428, Idaho Code.

§ 72-430. Permanent disability — Determination of — Percentages — Schedule.

Matters to be considered. In determining percentages of permanent disabilities, account shall be taken of the nature of the physical disablement, the disfigurement if of a kind likely to limit the employee in procuring or holding employment, the cumulative effect of multiple injuries, the occupation of the employee, and his age at the time of accident causing the injury, or manifestation of the occupational disease, consideration being given to the diminished ability of the afflicted employee to compete in an open labor market within a reasonable geographical area considering all the personal and economic circumstances of the employee, and other factors as the commission may deem relevant, provided that when a scheduled or unscheduled income benefit is paid or payable for the permanent partial or total loss or loss of use of a member or organ of the body no additional benefit shall be payable for disfigurement.

Preparation of schedules — Availability for inspection—Prima facie evidence. The commission may prepare, adopt and from time to time amend a schedule for the determination of the percentages of unscheduled permanent injuries less than total, including, but not limited to, a schedule for partial loss of binaural hearing and for loss of teeth, and methods for determination thereof. Such schedule shall be available for public inspection, and without formal introduction in evidence shall be prima facie evidence of the percentages of permanent disabilities to be attributed to the injuries or diseases covered by such schedule.

§ 72-431. Inheritability of scheduled or unscheduled income benefits.

When an employee who has sustained disability compensable as a scheduled or unscheduled permanent disability less than total, and who has filed a valid claim in his lifetime, dies from causes other than the injury or occupational disease before the expiration of the compensable period specified, the income benefits specified and unpaid at the employee’s death, whether or not accrued or due at the time of his death, shall be paid, under an award made before or after such death, to and for the benefit of the persons within the classes at the time of death and in the proportions and upon the conditions specified in this subsection and in the order named:

To the dependent widow or widower, if there is no child under the age of eighteen (18) or child incapable of self-support; or

If there are both such a widow or widower and such a child or children, one-half (1/2) to such widow or widower and the other one-half (1/2) to such child or children; or

If there is no such widow or widower but such a child or children, then to such child or children; or

If there is no survivor in the above classes, then to the personal representative of the decedent.